Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 10.1-500.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Board”
means the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.

“County”
includes towns.

“City”
includes all cities chartered under the Commonwealth.

“District”
or

“soil and water conservation district”

means a political subdivision of this Commonwealth organized in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

“District director”
means a member of the governing body of a district authorized to serve as a director.

“Due notice”
means notice published at least twice, with an interval of at least seven days between the two publication dates, in a newspaper or other publication of general circulation within the appropriate area, or if no such publication of general circulation is available, by posting at a reasonable number of conspicuous places within the appropriate area. Such posting shall include, where possible, posting at public places where it is customary to post notices concerning county or municipal affairs. Hearings held pursuant to such notice, at the time and place designated in the notice, may be adjourned from time to time without renewing the notice for the adjourned dates.

“Governing body of a city or county”
means the entire governing body regardless of whether all or part of that city or county is included or to be included within a district.

“Government”
or

“governmental”

includes the government of this Commonwealth, the government of the United States, and any of their subdivisions, agencies or instrumentalities.

“Land occupier”
or

“occupier of land”

includes any person, firm or corporation who holds title to, or is in possession of, any lands lying within a district organized, or proposed to be organized, under the provisions of this chapter, in the capacity of owner, lessee, renter, tenant, or cropper. The terms “land occupier” and “occupier of land” shall not include an ordinary employee or hired hand who is furnished a dwelling, garden, utilities, supplies, or the like, as part payment, or payment in full, for his labor.

“Locality”
means a county, city or town.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-3; 1950, p. 76; 1954, c. 670; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1985, c. 448; 1988, c. 891.

Cross references.

As to agricultural stewardship generally, see Chapter 4 (§ 3.2-400 et seq.) of Title 3.2.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-577. Deed of Easement for Open-Space Land — Riparian Zone.

§ 10.1-500.1.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this chapter the Board or the Director is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Board or the Director may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.

§ 10.1-501.
Duty of the Attorney General.

The Attorney General shall represent and provide consultation and legal advice in suits or actions under this chapter upon request of the district directors or districts.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-89; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891; 2005, c. 236; 2008, c. 577.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 236 added “unless the Attorney General provides legal services pursuant to § 2.2-507” at the end of the section.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 577 rewrote this section, which read:
“The attorney for the Commonwealth of the county or city in which the suits or actions under this chapter may arise shall represent the district directors or districts in such suits or actions unless the Attorney General provides legal services pursuant to § 2.2-507.”

§ 10.1-501.1.
Defense of claims.

The Attorney General shall provide the legal defense against any claim made against any soil and water conservation district, director, officer, agent or employee thereof (i) arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of buildings, grounds or properties owned, leased or maintained by any soil and water conservation district or used by district employees or other authorized persons in the course of their employment, or (ii) arising out of acts or omissions of any nature while acting in an authorized governmental or proprietary capacity and in the course and scope of employment or authorization.

History.

1988, cc. 763, 780, 891.